Utah statutes.
65A-7-8.   Easements on state lands -- Division to make rules.
(1)  The division shall establish rules for the issuance of easements on,
through, and over any state land, and shall establish price schedules.
(2)  A patent for state lands is subject to any existing easement or public
right-of-way.
